Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202082-804
First Regiment Nebraska Volunteer Infantry at Fort Donelson Committee; purpose; funding.

The purpose of the First Regiment Nebraska Volunteer Infantry at Fort Donelson Committee shall be funded by gifts, grants, bequests, donations, and other privately donated funds and administered by a private foundation. No general funds of the state shall be expended for the purpose of sections 82-801 to 82-804.

Laws 2020, LB850, § 4.
August 7, 2020